Ohio, session 136, HB949.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3345.211 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3345.211. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Campus area" means any building, bus, grounds, recreation area, athletic field, or any other property owned, operated, or in use by the board of trustees of a state institution of higher education. (2) "Nonlethal self-defense weapon" means pepper spray, a pepper spray gun, pepper gel, mace, a taser, an electric control device, a stun gun, or other conducted energy device. (3) "Organization" has the same meaning as in section 2901.23 of the Revised Code except that it includes a state institution of higher education. (4) "State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (B) No state institution of higher education shall knowingly do any of the following: (1) Prohibit a person eighteen years of age or older from possessing a nonlethal self-defense weapon or using a nonlethal self-defense weapon in self-defense while the person is lawfully present in the campus area of a state institution of higher education; (2) Impose disciplinary action on a person eighteen years of age or older for possessing a nonlethal self-defense weapon or using a nonlethal self-defense weapon in self-defense while the person is lawfully present in the campus area of a state institution of higher education; (3) Require a person eighteen years of age or older to register a nonlethal self-defense weapon; (4) Require a person eighteen years of age or older to obtain approval from a state institution of higher education before possessing a nonlethal self-defense weapon or using a nonlethal self-defense weapon in self-defense. (C) A state institution of higher education shall permit students who are eighteen years of age or older to store nonlethal self-defense weapons in campus housing facilities and shall not impose storage restrictions that render the nonlethal self-defense weapons inaccessible during emergencies. (D) A state institution of higher education that violates this section is guilty of improper interference with nonlethal self-defense weapons on campus, a misdemeanor of the first degree. Notwithstanding section 2929.31 of the Revised Code, the court shall impose on the organization a fine in the amount of fifty thousand dollars. Section 2. This act shall be known as the Campus Self-Defense Act.